lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Verslo ir namų apsauga > Apsaugos monitoriai ir įrašymo įrenginiai: CCTV monitoriai; CCTV testavimo monitoriai; Apsaugos skaitmeniniai vaizdo įrašymo įrenginiai
sv: Hem och trädgård > Företags- och hemsäkerhet > Säkerhetsmonitorer och videokameror: Monitorer för övervakningskameror; Testmonitorer för övervakningskameror; Digitala säkerhetskameror
fr: Maison et jardin > Sécurité à domicile et au bureau > Systèmes de surveillance et d’enregistrement: Systèmes de surveillance; Systèmes de test de surveillance; Enregistreurs vidéo numériques de sécurité
pl: Dom i ogród > Bezpieczeństwo domu i biura > Monitory i rejestratory bezpieczeństwa: Monitory CCTV; Monitory testowe CCTV; Cyfrowe rejestratory wideo do monitoringu
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Zabezpečenie firmy a domácnosti > Bezpečnostné monitory a záznamníky: Monitory pre CCTV kamery; Testovacie monitory pre CCTV kamery; Bezpečnostné digitálne videorekordéry
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 防犯・セキュリティ > 防犯カメラ: CCTVモニター; CCTVテストモニター; セキュリティデジタルビデオレコーダー
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Securitatea afacerii și a locuinței > Monitoare și dispozitive de înregistrare de securitate: Monitoare CCTV; Monitoare de test CCTV; Înregistratoare video digitale de securitate
es: Casa y jardín > Seguridad empresarial y del hogar > Cámaras y monitores de seguridad: Monitores CCTV; Monitores de prueba de CCTV; Grabadoras de vídeo digitales de seguridad
nb: Hjem og hage > Bedrifts- og hjemmesikkerhet > Sikkerhetsskjermer og -opptakere: Skjermer for overvåkningskameraer; Testskjermer for overvåkningskameraer; Digitale sikkerhetsvideoopptakere
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Сигурност за дома и офиса > Монитори и записващи устройства за сигурност: Монитори за видеонаблюдение; Тестови монитори за видеонаблюдение; Дигитални записващи устройства за сигурност
vi: Nhà và vườn > An ninh doanh nghiệp và nhà ở > Máy quay và thiết bị giám sát an ninh: Màn hình CCTV; Màn hình kiểm tra CCTV; Đầu Ghi Hình Kỹ Thuật Số An Ninh
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Ασφάλεια επιχειρήσεων & σπιτιού > Οθόνες & συσκευές εγγραφής ασφαλείας: Οθόνες CCTV; Οθόνες ελέγχου CCTV; Ψηφιακές συσκευές εγγραφής βίντεο ασφαλείας
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > İş ve Ev Güvenliği > Güvenlik Monitör ve Kayıt Cihazları: CCTV Monitörleri; CCTV Test Monitörleri; Güvenlik Dijital Video Kayıt Cihazları
nl: Huis en tuin > Bedrijfs- en woonhuisbeveiliging > Beveiligingsmonitoren en -recorders: CCTV-monitoren; CCTV-testmonitoren; Digitale videorecorders voor beveiliging
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Sigurnost na poslu i kod kuće > Sigurnosni monitori i uređaji za snimanje: Nadzorne kamere na javnim površinama; Testne nadzorne kamere na javnim površinama; Sigurnosni digitalni videosnimači
da: Hjem og have > Sikkerhed i hjemmet > Sikkerhedsskærme og -optagere: CCTV-skærme; CCTV-testskærme; Digitale videooptagere til sikkerhed
hu: Otthon és kert > Üzleti és otthoni biztonság > Biztonsági monitorok és felvevők: CCTV-monitorok; CCTV-tesztmonitorok; Biztonsági digitális videorögzítők
ru: Дом и сад > Безопасность жилой и коммерческой недвижимости > Мониторы и регистраторы для системы безопасности: Мониторы для системы видеонаблюдения; Мониторы для настройки камер видеонаблюдения; Цифровые видеорегистраторы для систем видеонаблюдения
de: Heim & Garten > Haussicherheit > Überwachungsmonitore & -rekorder: CCTV-Monitore; CCTV-Testmonitore; Digitale Sicherheitsvideorekorder
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Segurança domiciliar e comercial > Monitores e câmeras de segurança: Monitores CFTV; Monitores de teste CFTV; Gravadores digitais de vídeo de segurança
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家/企業保全 > 監視攝影機: 監視器; 測試監視器; 監視數位錄影機
th: บ้านและสวน > ความปลอดภัยของธุรกิจและบ้าน > จอภาพและเครื่องบันทึกสำหรับความปลอดภัย: จอภาพกล้องวงจรปิด; จอภาพทดสอบกล้องวงจรปิด; เครื่องบันทึกวิดีโอดิจิทัลสำหรับกล้องวงจรปิด
en: Home & Garden > Business & Home Security > Security Monitors & Recorders: CCTV Monitors; CCTV Test Monitors; Security Digital Video Recorders
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 保险柜/保险箱 > 安全监视器/记录仪: 闭路电视监视器; 闭路电视测试监视器; 安全数字视频录像机
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Varovanje poslovnih in domačih prostorov > Varnostni monitorji in snemalniki: Nadzorni monitorji; Testni monitorji CCTV; Varnostni digitalni video snemalniki
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Segurança na empresa e em casa > Monitores e gravadores de segurança: Monitores de CFTV; Monitores de teste de CFTV; Gravadores de vídeo digital de segurança
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 기업/가정 보안 > 보안 카메라/녹화기: CCTV 모니터; CCTV 테스트 모니터; 보안용 DVR(디지털 비디오 레코더)
it: Casa e giardino > Sicurezza in casa e sul lavoro > Monitor e sistemi di registrazione di sicurezza: Monitor CCTV; Monitor di prova CCTV; Videoregistratori digitali di sicurezza
cs: Dům a zahrada > Zabezpečení firem a domácností > Bezpečnostní kamery a záznamníky: Monitory CCTV; Testovací monitory CCTV; Bezpečnostní digitální videorekordéry
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Yritysten ja kodin turvallisuus > Valvontamonitorit ja -nauhurit: Valvontamonitorit; Valvontatestimonitorit; Digitaaliset tallentavat turvakamerat